Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.390

Offering circular—Certain manner of presentation of required information prohibited.

The information required in an offering circular shall not be set forth in such fashion as to obscure any of the required information or any information necessary to keep the required information from being incomplete or misleading.

[ 1981 c 85 s 77.]